Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Common Interest Communities
§ 2-110.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under subdivision 2-105(a)(8) of this title, the declarant shall prepare, execute and record an amendment to the declaration pursuant to section 2-117 of this title and in a condominium or planned community comply with section 2-109 of this title. The declarant is the unit owner of any units created. The amendment to the declaration shall assign an identifying number to each new unit created and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in subsection (b) of this section, reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment shall include a description of any common elements and any limited common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by section 2-108 of this title.

Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the common interest community if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by section 2-105 or 2-106 of this title and the plats and plans include all matters required by section 2-109 of this title. This provision does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to subdivision 2-105(a)(8) of this title.

Whenever a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both:

if the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration shall reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain; and

if the declarant subdivides the unit into two or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration provides, pursuant to subdivision 2-105(a)(8) of this title, that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal:

if all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

if a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no portion may be withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section generally describes the method by which any development right may be exercised. Importantly, while new development rights may be reserved within new real estate which is added to the common interest community, the original time limits on the exercise of these rights which the declarant must include in the original declaration may not be extended. Thus, the development process may continue only within the self-determined constraints originally described by the declarant.

The reservation and exercise of development rights is typically closely coordinated with financing for the project. As a result, lender review and control of that process is common, and the financing documents reflect the proposed development process.

A lender who holds a mortgage lien on one portion of a condominium or planned community may not cause that portion to be withdrawn from the condominium or planned community unless the portion constitutes withdrawable real estate in which there is no unit owner other than the declarant. Even then, except in the case of foreclosure, the amendment effectuating the withdrawal must be executed by the declarant.

As indicated in the Comments to Section 1-106, the withdrawal of real estate from a common interest community may constitute a subdivision of land under the applicable subdivision ordinance. Under most subdivision ordinances, the owner of the real estate is regarded as the ‘subdivider.‘ In the event of a withdrawal under this section, however, the declarant is in fact the subdivider because of his unique interest in and control over the real estate, even though the real estate, for title purposes, is a common element until withdrawn. Accordingly, he would bear the cost of compliance with any subdivision ordinance required to withdraw a part of the real estate from the common interest community

Subsection (c) deals with special problems surrounding allocated interests when the declarant subdivides or converts units which were originally created in the declaration into additional units, common elements, or both. This development right permits the declarant to defer a final decision as to the size of certain units by permitting the subdivision of larger interior spaces into smaller units. The declarant may thus “build to suit” for purchasers’ needs or to meet changing market demand.

A typical construction loan mortgage on a portion of a phased condominium or planned community might provide that as soon as that portion of land is added (or, if the portion is also designated withdrawable land, as soon thereafter as anyone other than the declarant becomes the unit owner of a unit in the withdrawable land) the mortgage on that land and on any buildings containing units built on that land before it was added converts into a mortgage on all of the units located within that portion, together in the case of a condominium, with their respective common element interests.
In the case of a condominium, the common element interest of those units will, of course, extend to the common elements in other sections of the condominium.
Therefore, conveyance of the units in that phase to the lender or to a purchaser at a foreclosure sale would automatically transfer all of those units’ common element interest, as a result of the requirements of Sections 2-107(f) and 2-110(a).

Therefore, a lender may wish to require that an amendment withdrawing the portion on which he has a mortgage be executed by the declarant and placed in escrow at the time the loan is made in order to protect against a recalcitrant borrower. Alternatively, a lender after foreclosure under Section 2-118(k) may require an amendment from the association.
Also a lender could itself execute the amendment if the lender buys in at a foreclosure sale or takes a deed in lieu of foreclosure and elects to become a declarant under Section 3-104(c) or (a).

For example, a declarant of a five-story office building common interest community may have purchasers committed at the time of the filing of the common interest community declaration but a lack of purchasers for the upper two floors.
In such a circumstance, the declarant could designate the upper two floors as a unit, reserving to himself the right to subdivide or convert that unit into additional units, common elements or a combination of units and common elements as needed to suit the requirements of ultimate purchasers.

If, at a later time, a purchaser wishes to purchase half of one floor as a unit, the declarant could exercise the development right to subdivide his two-floor unit into two or more units.
He may also wish to reserve a portion of the divided floor as a corridor which will constitute common elements.
In that case, he would proceed pursuant to this subsection to reallocate the allocated interests among the units in the manner described in this section.

Alternatively, the declarant may ultimately decide that the entire two floors should be turned over to the unit owners’ association not as a unit but as common elements to be used perhaps as a cafeteria serving the balance of the building, or for retail space to be rented by the association.
In that case, should he choose to make the entire two floors common elements, the provisions of paragraph (c)(1) would apply.

The declarant may state in his declaration any conditions or limitations on the time limits reserved for the exercise of development rights which would cause that development right to lapse before the time established in the declaration.
It would, of course, be possible for a declarant to voluntarily relinquish those rights prior to the time that they automatically lapsed, and an instrument recorded by the declarant would be effective to cause that lapse, subject, of course, to any constraints imposed on voluntary relinquishment by the declarant’s lender.

§ 2-111.
Alterations of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a unit owner:

may make any improvements or alterations to his or her unit that do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the common interest community;

may not change the appearance of the common elements or the exterior appearance of a unit or any other portion of the common interest community without permission of the association;

after acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, may remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures in it even if the partition in whole or in part is a common element if those acts do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the common interest community. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this subdivision is not an alteration of boundaries.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section deals with permissible alterations of the interior of a unit, and impermissible alterations of the exterior of a unit and the common elements, in ways which reflect common practice. The stated rules, of course, may be varied by the declaration where desired.

Subsection (3) deals in a unique manner with the problem of creating access between adjoining units owned by the same person. The subsection provides a specific rule which would permit a door, stairwell, or removal of a partition wall between those units, so long as structural integrity is not impaired. That alteration would not be an alteration of boundaries, but would be an exception to the basic rule stated in subsection (2).

In considering permissible alteration of the interior of a unit, an example may be useful. A nail driven by a unit owner to hang a picture might enter a portion of the wall designated as part of the common elements, but this section would not be violated because structural integrity would not be impaired. Moreover, no trespass would be committed because each unit owner, as a part or beneficial owner of the common elements, has a right to utilize them subject only to such restrictions as may be created by the Act, the declaration, bylaws, and the unit owners’ association pursuant to Section 3-102.

Removal of a partition or the creation of an opening between adjoining units would permit the units to be used as one, but they would not become one unit. They would continue to be separate units within the meaning of Section 1-105 and would continue to be treated separately for the purposes of this Act.

In addition to the restrictions placed on unit owners by this section, the declaration or bylaws may restrict a unit owner from altering the interior appearance of his unit. Although this might be an undue restriction if imposed upon the primary residence of a unit owner, it may be appropriate in the case of time-share or other common interest communities.

§ 2-112.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of those units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their allocated interests, the application must state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines, within 30 days after receipt of the application, that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved and states the reallocations. The amendment shall be executed by those unit owners, shall contain words of conveyance between them, and, on recordation, shall be indexed in the name of the grantor and the grantee and in the grantee’s index in the name of the association.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, boundaries between units and common elements may be relocated to incorporate common elements within a unit by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owner of the unit who proposes to relocate a boundary. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the amendment may be approved only if persons entitled to cast at least 67 percent of the votes in the association, including 67 percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by the declarant, agree to the action. The amendment may describe any fees or charges payable by the owner of the affected unit in connection with the boundary relocation and the fees and charges are assets of the association. The amendment must be executed by the unit owner of the unit whose boundary is being relocated and by the association, contain words of conveyance between them, and on recordation be indexed in the name of the unit owner and the association as grantor or grantee, as appropriate.

The association:

in a condominium or planned community shall prepare and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries of affected units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers; and

in a cooperative shall prepare and record amendments to the declaration, including any plans, necessary to show or describe the altered boundaries of affected units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section changes the effect of most current declarations, under which the boundaries between units may not be altered without unanimous or nearly unanimous consent of the unit owners. As the section makes clear, this result may be varied by restrictions in the declaration.

This section contemplates that upon relocation of the unit boundaries, no reallocation of allocated interests will occur if none is specified in the application. If a reallocation is specified but the executive board deems it unreasonable, then the applicants have the choice of resubmitting the application with a reallocation more acceptable to the board, or going to court to challenge the board’s findings as unreasonable.

The distinctions made by this section as to information required in the amendment, track the distinctions found in the corresponding UCA, UPCA, and MRECA provisions, for condominiums, planned communities, and cooperatives, respectively.

Experience under the original Act indicates that it does not adequately address the frequently occurring issue of new additions to existing units, which commonly encroach on the common elements. While the use of limited common elements is a possible device to address this question—and while this new subsection does not prohibit use of that device—the drafters believe that new subsection (b), added in the 1994 amendment, offers a more direct means to address this situation.

If the only common element being incorporated into a unit is a wall separating two adjoining units owned by different owners, the amendment should be made under Section 2-112(a), not (b). However, if one owner owns two adjoining units, the wall may be removed pursuant to Section 2-111 without altering the boundaries, and without the need for any amendment to the declaration.

While this section sets the default rule for such additions, local zoning and other rules would continue to limit its applicability.

This revision provides a mechanism to alter the boundary between a unit and the common elements and sets out a default rule with respect to association action to accomplish that result.
In the absence of this rule, Section 2-117(d) mandates that a change in a unit boundary requires unanimous consent of all owners.
With this amendment, unanimity is no longer required.

In addition, the Act contemplates that the declaration of a particular project may be drafted or amended in order to address the particular concerns of those unit owners most directly affected by such a relocation as a result of the addition’s proximity, or by its aesthetic impact.

Thus, for example, the declaration may state who is entitled to vote and what percentage of unit owners’ approval is required.
For instance, the declaration may provide for voting only by owners in a particular building or neighborhood, or it may delegate that decision to the executive board on a case by case basis.

An amendment pursuant to this subsection may not, by itself, alter the allocated interests in the community; such a change may be made only pursuant to Section 2-117(d).
As a consequence, a fee or charge described in the amendment will likely be in the nature of either a single one time fee or charge, or a recurring surcharge which is payable in addition to the periodic common expense charge originally set out in the declaration, or both.

Example:
The declaration might be amended to state that the owner of a unit with a 100 square foot addition shall, in addition to regularly calculated monthly common charges, pay a monthly fee of $10, increased each year by a percentage equal to the percentage increase in the association budget.

§ 2-113.
Subdivision of units.

If the declaration expressly so permits, a unit may be subdivided into two or more units. Subject to the declaration and law other than this title, upon application to subdivide a unit, the association shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration, including the plats and plans, subdividing that unit.

The amendment to the declaration shall be executed by the owner of the unit to be subdivided, shall assign an identifying number to each unit created, and reallocate the allocated interests formerly allocated to the subdivided unit to the new units in any reasonable manner prescribed by the owner of the subdivided unit or on any other basis the declaration requires.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-114.
Easement for encroachments.

To the extent that any unit or common element in a common interest community encroaches on any other unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a unit owner of liability for the owner’s willful misconduct nor relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to any plats and plans.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 2-115.
Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices and models in units or on common elements in the common interest community only if the declaration so provides and specifies the rights of a declarant with regard to the number, size, location and relocation of it. In a condominium, any sales office, management office or model not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element. If a declarant ceases to be a unit owner, that declarant ceases to have any rights with regard to the common element unless it is removed promptly in accordance with a right to remove reserved in the declaration. Subject to any limitations in the declaration, a declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the common interest community. The provisions of this section are subject to local ordinances.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section prescribes the circumstances under which portions of the common interest community—either units or common elements—may be used for sales offices, management offices, or models. The basic requirement is that the declarant must describe his rights to maintain such offices in the declaration. There are no limitations on that right, so that either units owned by the declarant or other persons, or the common elements themselves, may be used for that purpose. Typical common element uses might include a sales booth in the lobby of a building, or a trailer or temporary building located outside the buildings on the grounds of the property.

In addition, this section contains a permissive provision permitting advertising on the common elements. The declarant may choose to limit his rights in terms of the size, location, or other matters affecting the advertising. The Act, however, imposes no limitations. At the same time, the last sentence of the section recognizes that state or local zoning or other laws may limit advertising, both in terms of size and content of the advertising, or the use of the units or common elements for such purposes. This section makes it clear that local law would apply in those cases.

§ 2-116.
Easement rights.

Subject to the declaration, a declarant has such easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under this title or reserved in the declaration.

Subject to subdivision 3-102(a)(6) and section 3-112 of this title, the unit owners have an easement in the common elements for access to their units.

Subject to the declaration and the rules, the owners have a right to use the common elements that are not limited common elements and all real estate that must become common elements for the purposes for which they were intended.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-117.
Amendment of declaration.

Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under subsection 2-109(f) or section 2-110 of this title, or the association under subsection 2-106(d), 2-108(c), and 2-112(a) or section 2-113 of this title, or by certain unit owners under subsections 2-108(b), 2-112(a), 2-113(b), or 2-118(b) of this title, and except as limited by other subsections of this section, the declaration, including any plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least 67 percent of the votes in the association is allocated unless the declaration specifies a different percentage for all amendments or for specific subjects of amendment. If the declaration requires the approval of another person as a condition of its effectiveness, the amendment is not valid without that approval.

No action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section may be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration shall be recorded in every town in which any portion of the common interest community is located, and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment, except an amendment pursuant to subsection 2-112(a) of this title, shall be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the common interest community and the association, and in the grantor’s index in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of this title, no amendment may create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, change the boundaries of any unit, or change the allocated interests of a unit, or the uses to which any unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the unit owners.

Amendments to the declaration required by this title to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of designation, by the president of the association.

Provisions in the declaration creating special declarant rights that have not expired may not be amended without the consent of the declarant.

The time limits specified in the declaration pursuant to subdivision 2-105(a)(8) of this title within which reserved development rights must be exercised may be extended, and additional development rights may be created, if persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including 80 percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by the declarant, agree to that action. The agreement is effective 30 days after an amendment to the declaration reflecting the terms of the agreement is recorded unless all the persons holding the affected special declarant rights, or security interests in those rights, record a written objection within the 30-day period, in which case the amendment is void, or consent in writing at the time the amendment is recorded, in which case the amendment is effective when recorded.

If any provision of this title or of the declaration requires the consent of a holder of a security interest in a unit as a condition to the effectiveness of an amendment to the declaration, that consent is deemed granted if a refusal to consent in a record is not received by the association within 60 days after the association delivers notice of the proposed amendment to the holder at an address for notice provided by the holder or mails the notice to the holder by certified mail, return receipt requested, at that address. If the holder has not provided to the association an address for notice, the association shall provide notice to the address in the security interest of record. Notwithstanding this section, an amendment to the declaration that affects the priority of a holder’s security interest or the ability of that holder to foreclose its security interest may not be adopted without that holder’s consent in a record if the declaration requires that consent as a condition to the effectiveness of the amendment.

If the declaration contains a provision requiring that amendments to the declaration may be adopted only by the vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which more than 80 percent of the votes in the association are allocated, the amendment is approved:

if:

unit owners of units to which at least 80 percent of the votes in the association are allocated vote for or agree to the proposed amendment;

no unit owner votes against the proposed amendment; and

notice of the proposed amendment is delivered to the unit owners holding the votes in the association which have not voted or agreed to the proposed amendment and no written objection to the proposed amendment is received by the association within 60 days after the association delivers notice; or

unit owners of units to which at least 80 percent of the votes in the association are allocated vote for or agree to the proposed amendment but at least one unit owner objects to the proposed amendment and, pursuant to an action brought by the association in the superior court for the county in which the common interest community is located against all objecting unit owners, the court finds that the objecting unit owners do not have an interest, different in kind from the interests of the other unit owners, that the voting requirement of the declaration was intended to protect.

An amendment to the declaration may prohibit or materially restrict the permitted uses of or behavior in a unit or the number or other qualifications of persons who may occupy units only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least 80 percent of the votes in the association are allocated, unless the declaration specifies that a larger percentage of unit owners must vote or agree to that amendment or that such an amendment may be approved by unit owners of units having at least 80 percent of the votes of a specified group of units that would be affected by the amendment. An amendment approved under this subsection must provide reasonable protection for a use or occupancy permitted at the time the amendment was adopted.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-118.
Termination of common interest community.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain or in the circumstances described in section 2-124 of this title, a common interest community may be terminated only by agreement of unit owners of units to which at least 80 percent of the votes in the association is allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, and with any other approvals required by the declaration. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

An agreement to terminate shall be executed or ratified in the same manner as a deed by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination agreement shall specify a date after which the agreement is void unless it is recorded. A termination agreement and all ratifications of it shall be recorded in each town in which a portion of the common interest community is situated.

In the case of a common interest community containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all the common elements and units of the common interest community shall be sold following termination. If, pursuant to the agreement, any real estate in the common interest community is to be sold following termination, the termination agreement shall set forth the minimum terms of the sale.

In the case of a common interest community containing any units not having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements, but may not require that the units be sold following termination, unless the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or unless all the unit owners consent to the sale.

The association on behalf of the unit owners may contract for the sale of real estate in a common interest community, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section. If any real estate is to be sold following termination, title to that real estate upon termination vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the units. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds distributed, the association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination. Proceeds of the sale shall be distributed to unit owners and lienholders as their interests appear, in accordance with subsections (h), (i), and (j) of this section. Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, while the association holds title to the real estate, each unit owner and the unit owner’s successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupy the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit. During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner and the unit owner’s successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit owners by this title or the declaration.

If the real estate constituting the common interest community is not to be sold following termination, title to the common elements and, in a common interest community containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, title to all the real estate in the common interest community vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection (j) of this section and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common exists, each unit owner and the unit owner’s successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupy the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit.

Following termination of the common interest community, the proceeds from the sale of real estate and assets of the association are held by the association as trustee for unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear.

Following termination of the common interest community, creditors of the association holding liens on the units which were recorded pursuant to

12 V.S.A. § 2904

before termination may enforce those liens in the same manner as any lienholder. All other creditors of the association shall be treated as if they had perfected liens on the units immediately before termination.

The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (e), (f), (g), and (h) of this section are as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the respective interests of unit owners are the fair market values of their units, allocated interests and any limited common elements immediately before the termination as determined by one or more independent appraisers selected by the association. The independent appraisals shall be distributed to the unit owners and become final unless the unit owners to whom 25 percent or more of the votes in the association are allocated disapprove the appraisal. A unit owner’s interest is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner’s unit and its allocated interests by the total fair market value of all the units and their allocated interests.

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of its fair market value before destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are:

in a condominium, their respective common element interests immediately before the termination;

in a planned community, their respective common expense liabilities immediately before the termination.

Except as provided in subdivision (i)(1) of this section, foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against the entire common interest community does not terminate the common interest community, and foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the common interest community, other than withdrawable real estate, does not withdraw that portion from the common interest community. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not, of itself, withdraw that real estate from the common interest community, but the person taking title to it has the right to request from the association an amendment excluding the real estate from the common interest community.

If a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the real estate comprising the common interest community has priority over the declaration and the lien or encumbrance has not been partially released, the parties foreclosing the lien or encumbrance may, upon foreclosure, record an instrument excluding the real estate subject to that lien or encumbrance from the common interest community.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-119.
Rights of secured lenders.

The declaration may require that all or a specified number or percentage of the lenders who hold security interests in the units or common elements approve specified actions of the unit owners or the association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions, but lack of approval will not have the effect of:

denying or delegating control over the general administrative affairs of the association by the unit owners or the executive board; or

preventing the association or the executive board from participating in any litigation or proceeding; or

preventing an insurance trustee or the association from receiving and distributing insurance proceeds except pursuant to section 3-113 of this title.

A lender who has extended credit to an association secured by an assignment of income (subdivision 3-102(a)(14) of this title) or an encumbrance on the common elements (section 3-112) may enforce its security agreement in accordance with its terms, subject to the requirements of this title and other law. Requirements that the association must deposit its periodic common charges before default with the lender to which the association’s income has been assigned, or increase its common charges at the lender’s direction by amounts reasonably necessary to amortize the loan in accordance with its terms, do not violate the prohibitions on lender approval contained in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.